Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 7. Contributions.

§ 51.1-144.
Member contributions.

Each member shall contribute five percent of his creditable compensation for each pay period for which he receives compensation.The employer shall deduct the contribution payable by the member. Every employee accepting employment shall be deemed to consent and agree to any deductions from his compensation required by this chapter.

In determining the creditable compensation of a member in a payroll period, the Board may consider the rate of compensation payable to the member on the date of entry or removal of his name from the payroll as having been received throughout the month if service for the month is creditable. If service for the month is not creditable, the Board may consider any compensation payable during the month as not being creditable compensation.

The minimum compensation provided by law for any member shall be reduced by the deduction required by this section. Except for any benefits provided by this chapter, payment of compensation minus the deductions shall be a full and complete discharge of all claims for services rendered by the member during the period covered by the payment.

No deduction shall be made from any member’s compensation if the employer’s contribution is in default.

The Board may modify the method of collecting the contributions of members so that the employer may retain the amounts deducted from members’ salaries and have a corresponding amount deducted from state funds otherwise payable to the employer.

Only as provided in subdivisions 3 and 4 may any employer elect to pay an equivalent amount in lieu of any member contributions required of its employees. Such payments shall be credited to the members’ contribution account. These contributions shall not be considered wages for purposes of Chapter 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.), nor shall they be considered to be salary for purposes of this chapter.
F. 1. Only as provided in subdivisions 3 and 4 may any employer elect to pay an equivalent amount in lieu of any member contributions required of its employees. Such payments shall be credited to the members’ contribution account. These contributions shall not be considered wages for purposes of Chapter 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.), nor shall they be considered to be salary for purposes of this chapter.

A person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall be required to pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code in the amount of five percent of creditable compensation if the person is (i) a member covered by the defined benefit plan established under this chapter, (ii) a member of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System under Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), (iii) a member of the Virginia Law Officers’ Retirement System under Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), (iv) a member of the Judicial Retirement System under Chapter 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.), or (v) earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

.

A member who is an employee of a county, city, town, or other local employer other than a local public school board, regardless of whether the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall be required to pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code in the amount of five percent of creditable compensation as follows: (i) any member who commences or recommences employment on or after July 1, 2012, shall be required to contribute five percent of his creditable compensation upon commencing or recommencing employment and (ii) members in service on June 30, 2012, shall be required to contribute five percent of their creditable compensation no later than July 1, 2016. Such member described in subdivision (ii) shall contribute a minimum of an additional one percent of his creditable compensation beginning on each July 1 of 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2016, or until the member’s contribution equals five percent of creditable compensation, but the county, city, town, or other local employer other than a local public school board may elect to require members to contribute more than an additional one percent each year, in whole percentages. In no case shall a member be required to contribute more than five percent of his creditable compensation for each pay period for which he receives compensation. No county, city, town, or other local employer other than a local public school board shall be allowed to elect to pay any amount of member contributions except to pay the difference between five percent and the employee contribution during the phase-in period described in this subdivision for a member who was in service on June 30, 2012.

A member who is an employee of a local public school board, regardless of whether the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall be required to pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code in the amount of five percent of creditable compensation as follows: (i) any member who commences or recommences employment on or after July 1, 2012, shall be required to contribute five percent of his creditable compensation upon commencing or recommencing employment and (ii) members in service on June 30, 2012, shall be required to contribute five percent of their creditable compensation no later than July 1, 2016. Such member described in subdivision (ii) shall contribute a minimum of an additional one percent of his creditable compensation beginning on each July 1 of 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, and 2016, or until the member’s contribution equals five percent of creditable compensation, but the local public school board employer may elect to require members to contribute more than an additional one percent each year, in whole percentages. In no case shall a member be required to contribute more than five percent of his creditable compensation for each pay period for which he receives compensation. No local public school board employer shall be allowed to elect to pay any amount of member contributions except to pay the difference between five percent and the employee contribution during the phase-in period described in this subdivision for a member who was in service on June 30, 2012.

The Board may develop procedures to effect the transfer of member contributions paid by employers on or after July 1, 1980, and accrued interest on those contributions, to the member contribution account of the member, if such contributions have been previously deposited into the retirement allowance account of the employer.

History.

1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.13, 51-111.46; 1956, c. 560; 1960, c. 604; 1966, c. 174; 1972, c. 568; 1974, c. 353; 1976, c. 537; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.46:1; 1982, c. 467; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832; 1998, c. 660; 2001, cc. 693, 702; 2002, c. 307; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2012, c. 822; 2013, c. 463.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1980, c. 722, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides:

“That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any member of the retirement system on March thirty-one, nineteen hundred eighty, or to any member whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date, except that the provision setting forth that salary received by members of the General Assembly pursuant to §§ 14.1-17.1 and 14.1-18 [see now §§ 30-19.11 and 30-19.12] shall be deemed creditable compensation and shall apply to all such members on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1980].”

Thus this section as in effect prior to the 1980 act remains in effect, but applies only to persons who were members of the retirement system on March 31, 1980, or whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date.

Acts 2012, c. 822, cl. 2 provides: “That any county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer that currently pays any portion of member contributions to the Virginia Retirement System that the member will be responsible for paying pursuant to the provisions of this act shall provide an increase in total creditable compensation, effective July 1, 2012, to each affected member who was in service on June 30, 2012, to offset the cost of the member contributions. Such increase in total creditable compensation shall be equal to the difference between five percent of an employee’s total creditable compensation and the percentage of the member contribution paid by the local member on January 1, 2012. If a county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer elects to phase in the member contributions pursuant to subdivision F 3 or F 4 of §

51.1-144

of the Code of Virginia, the increase in total creditable compensation may also be phased in at the same rate.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 4-6.03 j, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The provisions in §

51.1-144

, Code of Virginia, that require a member to contribute five percent of his creditable compensation for each pay period for which he receives compensation on a salary reduction basis, shall not apply to any (i) ‘state employee,’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, Code of Virginia, who is an elected official, or (ii) member of the Judicial Retirement System under Chapter 3 of Title 51.1 (§

51.1-300

et seq.), who is not a ‘person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, Code of Virginia.”

The 1998 amendment

added subsections G and H.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 693 and 702 are identical, and added subsection I.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 307, in clause (i) of subsection G, substituted “six years” for “three years” and inserted “or a period of time approved by the Board upon submission of a plan by the employer.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendmenst by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and rewrote subsections F and G.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 822 deleted “No deduction shall be taken from the compensation of a member after his normal retirement date if the member elects not to contribute.” at the end of the second paragraph of subsection A; corrected an internal reference in subdivision F 1; deleted “Each county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer may elect to pay an equivalent amount in lieu of the member contributions required of its employees described in this subdivision. The county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer may pay, in whole percentages, up to five percent of the creditable compensation otherwise required of such employees, provided that the employer pays the same percentage of creditable compensation for all such employees, and is paying all member contributions required under this section for all of its other member employees not described in this subdivision. Any portion of the five percent of creditable compensation required of a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, that is not paid by the county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer, shall be paid by such person.
No employer other than a county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer shall be allowed to elect to pay any amount of the member contributions required of a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010.” in subdivision F 2; inserted subdivision F 3 and F4 and redesignated former subdivision F3 as subdivision F5; deleted former subsection G, which read: “Subject to the provisions of subsection F, any employer whose employees are paying member contributions to the retirement system on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code may phase-in the payment of the member contributions on behalf of its employees upon notification to the Board of the employer’s intent to make such payments. The Board shall approve the period of time by which the phase-in shall be completed not to exceed six years from the commencement of the phased-in payments.”; deleted former subsection H, which read: “Any employer that, by resolution of its governing body, elects to provide retirement coverage for its employees in accordance with §

51.1-130

on or after September 1, 1998, shall allow its employees to pay member contributions to the retirement system on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code in lieu of paying the member contribution on behalf of its employees in accordance with the provisions of subsection F.”; redesignated former subsection I as subsection G; and made a stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463, in subdivision F 1, in the first sentence, substituted “Only” for “Except” at the beginning, substituted “may any employer elect” for “any employer may elect,” and substituted “any member” for “all member”; and deleted subdivision F 5 which read: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or other law, only those employers who were paying member contributions as of February 1, 2010, may pay member contributions. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a county, city, town, local public school board, or other local employer.”

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Local Government Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2012).

§ 51.1-145.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Employer contributions.

The total annual employer contribution for each employer, expressed as a percentage of the annual membership payroll, shall be determined in a manner so as to remain relatively level from year to year. Each employer shall contribute an amount equal to the sum of the normal contribution, any accrued liability contribution, and any supplementary contribution. The contribution rates for each employer shall be determined after each valuation and shall remain in effect until a new valuation is made. All contribution rates shall be computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board.

The normal employer contribution for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the normal contribution rate, of the total covered compensation of the members employed during the period.

The normal contribution rate for any employer shall be determined as the percentage represented by the ratio of (i) the annual normal cost to provide the benefits of the retirement system with respect to members employed by the employer in excess of the members’ contributions to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members.

The accrued liability contribution for any employer for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the accrued liability contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members during the period.

The accrued liability contribution rate for any employer shall be a percentage of the total annual compensation of the members, determined so that a continuation of annual contributions by the employer at the same percentage of total annual compensation over a period of 40 years will be sufficient to amortize the unfunded accrued liability with respect to the employer.

The unfunded accrued liability with respect to any employer as of any valuation date shall be determined as the excess of (i) the then present value of the benefits to be provided under the retirement system in the future to members and former members over (ii) the sum of the assets of the retirement system then currently in the members’ contribution account and in the employer’s retirement allowance account, plus the then present value of the stipulated contributions to be made in the future by the members, plus the then present value of the normal contributions expected to be made in the future by the employer.

The supplementary contribution for any employer for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the supplementary contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members employed during the period.

Until July 1, 1997, the supplementary contribution rate for any employer shall be determined as the percentage represented by the ratio of (i) the average annual amount of post-retirement supplements, as provided for in this chapter, which is anticipated to become payable during the period to which the rate will be applicable with respect to former members to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members.

The Board shall certify to each employer the applicable contribution rate and any changes in the rate.

The employer contribution for the year shall be increased to the extent necessary to overcome any insufficiency if the contributions for any employer, when combined with the amount of the retirement allowance account of the employer, are insufficient to provide the benefits payable during the year.

The appropriation bill which is submitted to the General Assembly by the Governor prior to each regular session that begins in an even-numbered year shall include the contributions which will become due and payable to the retirement allowance account from the state treasury during the following biennium. The amount of the contributions shall be based on the contribution rates certified by the Board pursuant to subsection I of this section that are applicable to the Commonwealth as an employer and the anticipated compensation during the biennium of the members of the retirement system on behalf of whom the Commonwealth is the employer.

For members who are state employees as defined in §

51.1-124.3

and who are participating in a retirement plan established pursuant to Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), (i) 67.02 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013, (ii) 78.02 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014, and July 1, 2015, (iii) 89.01 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2016, and July 1, 2017, and (iv) 100 percent for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018;

For members who are teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

and who are participating in a retirement plan established pursuant to Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), (i) 69.53 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013, (ii) 79.69 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014, and July 1, 2015, (iii) 89.84 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2016, and July 1, 2017, and (iv) 100 percent for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018;

For members participating in a retirement plan established pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), (i) 75.84 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013, (ii) 83.90 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014, and July 1, 2015, (iii) 91.95 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2016, and July 1, 2017, and (iv) 100 percent for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018;

For members participating in a retirement plan established pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), (i) 75.82 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013, (ii) 83.88 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014, and July 1, 2015, (iii) 91.94 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2016, and July 1, 2017, and (iv) 100 percent for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018; and

For members participating in a retirement plan established pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.), (i) 83.98 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013, (ii) 89.32 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2014, and July 1, 2015, (iii) 94.66 percent for fiscal years beginning July 1, 2016, and July 1, 2017, and (iv) 100 percent for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2018.

In the case of all teachers whose compensation is paid exclusively out of funds derived from local revenues and appropriations from the general fund of the state treasury, the Commonwealth shall contribute to the extent specified in the appropriations act. In the case of any teacher whose compensation is paid out of funds derived in whole or in part from any special fund or from a contributor other than the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof, contributions shall be paid out of the special fund or by the other contributor in proportion to that part of the compensation derived therefrom. In the case of all state employees whose compensation is paid exclusively by the Commonwealth out of the general fund of the state treasury, the Commonwealth shall be the sole contributor, and all contributions shall be paid out of the general fund. In the case of a state employee whose compensation is paid in whole or in part out of any special fund or by any contributor other than the Commonwealth, contributions on behalf of the employee shall be paid out of the special fund or by the other contributor in proportion to that part of the employee’s compensation derived therefrom. The governing body of each political subdivision is hereby authorized to make appropriations from the funds of the political subdivision necessary to pay its proportionate share of contributions on behalf of every state employee whose compensation is paid in part by the political subdivision. In the case of each person who has elected to remain a member of a local retirement system, the Commonwealth shall reimburse the local employer an amount equal to the product of the compensation of the person and the employer contribution rate as used to determine the employer contribution for state employees under this section. Each employer shall keep such records and periodically furnish such information as the Board may require and shall inform new employees of their duties and obligations in connection with the retirement system.

The employer contribution rate established for each employer may include the cost to administer any defined contribution plan administered by the Virginia Retirement System and available to the employer. The portion of such contribution designated to cover administrative costs of the defined contribution plans shall not be deposited into the trust fund established for the defined benefit plans but shall be separately accounted for and used solely to defray the administrative costs associated with the various defined contributions plans. This provision shall supplement the authority of the Board under §§

51.1-124.22

and

51.1-602

to charge and collect administrative fees to employers whose employees have available the various defined contribution plans administered by the Virginia Retirement System.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the total employer contribution for each employer authorized to participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

for any period, expressed as a percentage of the employer’s payroll for such period, shall be established as the contribution rate payable by such employer with respect to its employees enrolled in the defined benefit plan established under this chapter. The employer’s contribution shall be first applied to the defined contribution component of the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, and the remainder shall be deposited in the employer’s retirement allowance account. Institutions of higher education shall also pay contributions to the employer’s retirement allowance account in amounts representing the difference between the contribution rate payable with respect to employees enrolled in the defined benefit plan under this chapter and the employer contributions paid to any optional retirement plan it offers on behalf of any of its nonfaculty Covered Employees, as described in §§

23.1-1020

through

23.1-1026

. The employer contribution rate established for each employer may include the annual rate of contribution payable by such employer with respect to employees enrolled in the optional defined contribution retirement plans established under §§

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

, and

51.1-126.4

.

Employer contributions may be returned to the employer only as determined in accordance with § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans.

K1.

The General Assembly shall set contribution rates that are at least equal to the following percentage of the contribution rates certified by the Board pursuant to subsection I:

History.

1952, c. 157, §§ 51-111.12, 51-111.47; 1960, c. 604; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1974, c. 353; 1975, cc. 360, 597, 610, § 51-111.10:2; 1978, cc. 1, 841; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.47:01; 1981, c. 403; 1982, c. 467; 1985, c. 129; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 719; 1996, c. 1030; 2005, c. 161; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2013, c. 463; 2015, c. 660.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “§§

23.1-1020

through

23.1-1026

” was substituted for “Article 6 (§ 23-38.114 et seq.) of Chapter 4.10 of Title 23” in subsection N to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 1980, c. 722, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides:

“That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any member of the retirement system on March thirty-one, nineteen hundred eighty, or to any member whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date, except that the provision setting forth that salary received by members of the General Assembly pursuant to §§ 14.1-17.1 and 14.1-18 [see now §§ 30-19.11 and 30-19.12] shall be deemed creditable compensation and shall apply to all such members on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1980].”

Thus this section as in effect prior to the 1980 act remains in effect, but applies only to persons who were members of the retirement system on March 31, 1980, or whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 477 O, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. a.
In order to address the potential for stranded liability in the Virginia Retirement System, notwithstanding any other contrary provisions of the Appropriation Act or of §

51.1-145

, institutions of higher education that have established their own optional retirement plan under §

51.1-126

(B) shall pay, effective July 1, 2019, contributions to the employer’s retirement allowance account in an amount equal to that portion of the state employer contribution rate designated to pay down the total unfunded accrued liability, for any positions existing as of December 31, 2011 that are subsequently converted from non-Optional Retirement Plan for Higher Education (ORPHE) eligible positions to ORPHE-eligible positions on or after January 1, 2012 and that are filled by an employee who elects to participate in the ORPHE. In meeting this obligation, each institution shall provide to the Virginia Retirement System by April 1 of each year a list of all positions converted from non-ORPHE eligible positions to ORPHE-eligible positions since January 1, 2012, and whether current employees in such positions have elected ORPHE participation.

“b. Such contributions shall not be required for any new position established by the institution after January 1, 2012, that may be eligible for participation in the Optional Retirement Plan for Higher Education.

“2. Furthermore, the Department of Accounts, the Virginia Retirement System, and the universities of higher education shall work to develop a methodology to identify and report separately personnel services expenditures for university personnel in positions that use to be classified positions but have been transitioned to university staff positions.”

Acts
2022, cc. 9 and 229, cl. 3 provides: “That, notwithstanding the provisions of the second enactment of this act, beginning July 1, 2022, the Virginia Retirement System is authorized to communicate the forthcoming changes, update data systems, and train Virginia Retirement System employers to ensure a coordinated and seamless transition upon implementation of the provisions of the first enactment of this act and to develop procedures for the separation of defined benefit and defined contribution amounts prior to the implementation of the provisions of the first enactment of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 161 added subsection M and made a stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and added subsections K1 and N.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 463 inserted “authorized to participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

for any period” in the first sentence and substituted “payable by such employer” for “payable to such employer” in the last sentence in subsection N.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 added subsection O.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 9 and 229, effective July 1, 2024, are identical, and inserted “defined benefit” throughout except for the second occurrence in subsection N and for the occurrence in subsection O; rewrote subsection A, which read: “The total annual employer contribution for each employer, expressed as a percentage of the annual membership payroll, shall be determined in a manner so as to remain relatively level from year to year. Each employer shall contribute an amount equal to the sum of the normal contribution, any accrued liability contribution, and any supplementary contribution. The contribution rates for each employer shall be determined after each valuation and shall remain in effect until a new valuation is made. All contribution rates shall be computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board”; inserted “determined by the Board consistent with recognized actuarial principles and the Retirement System funding policy” in subsection E; inserted “the actuarial accrued liability over the sum of assets of the Retirement System as of the valuation date, as follows” in subsection F; added the second sentence in subsection I; redesignated former subsections K1, L, M, N (second paragraph thereof), and O, respectively, as current L, M, N, O, and P; in subsection K, added “an estimate of all state employer defined contribution amounts required by §

51.1-169

, and amounts for contributions to applicable ancillary benefits as otherwise required by this title” to the end of the first sentence and deleted “of this section” following “to subsection I” in the second sentence; substituted “appropriation” for “appropriations” in subsection M; substituted “contribution plans” for “contributions plans” in subsection N at the end of the second sentence; deleted former subsection N, which read: “Notwithstanding the foregoing, the total employer contribution for each employer authorized to participate in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

for any period, expressed as a percentage of the employer’s payroll for such period, shall be established as the contribution rate payable by such employer with respect to its employees enrolled in the defined benefit plan established under this chapter. The employer’s contribution shall be first applied to the defined contribution component of the hybrid retirement program described in §
51.1-169, and the remainder shall be deposited in the employer’s retirement allowance account”; added subsection Q; and made stylistic change.